District of Columbia statutes.
47-2717

Mayor to adjust medical and mental health service rates.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is hereby authorized to adjust, from time to time, the rates to be charged for the medical care and mental health services specified in §§ 47-2713 to 47-2716 except that the Mayor’s authority to adjust the rates to be charged for medical care at the outpatient clinic at District of Columbia General Hospital shall terminate on the date that the D.C. General Hospital Commission holds its first meeting pursuant to the provisions of §§ 44-1911 [repealed] and 44-1916(b) [repealed]. Notice of any change in the rates to be charged for the medical care and mental health services specified in §§ 47-2713 to 47-2716 shall be filed with the Council of the District of Columbia at least 30 days prior to their effective date.

History

Sept. 28, 1977, D.C. Law 2-24, § 3, 24 DCR 3343
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2717.
1973 Ed., § 47-2215b.